Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-3707
Hotel,
defined.

Hotel means any
facility in which the public may, for a consideration, obtain sleeping accommodations. Hotel includes hotels,
motels, tourist homes, campgrounds, courts, lodging houses, inns, state-operated
hotels, and nonprofit hotels but does not include hospitals, sanitariums,
nursing homes, chronic care centers, or dormitories or facilities operated
by an educational institution and regularly used to house students.

Laws 1980, LB 499, § 3;

Laws 1984, LB 962, § 35;

R.S.1943, (2008), § 81-1247;

Laws 2012, LB1053, § 7.